Ohio, session 136, HB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3794.03, 5739.02, and 5739.03 be amended and sections 3794.21, 3794.22, 3794.23, and 3794.24 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3794.03. Areas where smoking is not regulated by this chapter. The following shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter: (A) Private residences, except during the hours of operation as a child care or adult care facility for compensation, during the hours of operation as a business by a person other than a person residing in the private residence, or during the hours of operation as a business, when employees of the business, who are not residents of the private residence or are not related to the owner, are present. (B) Rooms for sleeping in hotels, motels and other lodging facilities designated as smoking rooms; provided, however, that not more than twenty per cent of sleeping rooms may be so designated. (C) Family-owned and operated places of employment in which all employees are related to the owner, but only if the enclosed areas of the place of employment are not open to the public, are in a freestanding structure occupied solely by the place of employment, and smoke from the place of employment does not migrate into an enclosed area where smoking is prohibited under the provisions of this chapter. (D) Any nursing home, as defined in division (A) of section 3721.10 of the Revised Code, but only to the extent necessary to comply with division (A)(18) of section 3721.13 of the Revised Code. If indoor smoking area is provided by a nursing home for residents of the nursing home, the designated indoor smoking area shall be separately enclosed and separately ventilated so that tobacco smoke does not enter, through entrances, windows, ventilation systems, or other means, any areas where smoking is otherwise prohibited under this chapter. Only residents of the nursing home may utilize the designated indoor smoking area for smoking. A nursing home may designate specific times when the indoor smoking area may be used for such purpose. No employee of a nursing home shall be required to accompany a resident into a designated indoor smoking area or perform services in such area when being used for smoking. (E)(1) Retail tobacco stores in operation prior to December 7, 2006. The retail tobacco store shall annually file with the department of health by the thirty-first day of January an affidavit stating the percentage of its gross income during the prior calendar year that was derived from the sale of cigars, cigarettes, pipes, or other smoking devices for smoking tobacco and related smoking accessories. (2) Any retail tobacco store that begins operation after December 7, 2006, or any existing retail tobacco store that relocates to another location after December 7, 2006, may only qualify for the exemption authorized by division (E) of this section if located in a freestanding structure occupied solely by the business and smoke from the business does not migrate into an enclosed area where smoking is prohibited under the provisions of this chapter. (3) A change of ownership of a retail tobacco store in operation prior to December 7, 2006, does not, in itself, constitute the beginning of a new operation or the relocation of an existing operation for the purposes of division (E)(2) of this section and does not, in itself, necessitate that the retail tobacco store relocate to a freestanding structure, as described in that division, in order to retain an exemption from the provisions of this chapter. (F) Outdoor patios. All outdoor patios shall be physically separated from an enclosed area. If windows or doors form any part of the partition between an enclosed area and the outdoor patio, the openings shall be closed to prevent the migration of smoke into the enclosed area. If windows or doors do not prevent the migration of smoke into the enclosed area, the outdoor patio shall be considered an extension of the enclosed area and subject to the prohibitions of this chapter. (G) Private clubs as defined in division (B)(13) of section 4301.01 of the Revised Code, provided all of the following apply: the club has no employees; the club is organized as a not-for-profit entity; only members of the club are present in the club's building; no persons under the age of eighteen are present in the club's building; the club is located in a freestanding structure occupied solely by the club; smoke from the club does not migrate into an enclosed area where smoking is prohibited under the provisions of this chapter; and, if the club serves alcohol, it holds a valid D4 liquor permit. (H) An enclosed space in a laboratory facility at an accredited college or university, when used solely and exclusively for clinical research activities by a person, organization, or other entity conducting institutional review board-approved scientific or medical research related to the health effects of smoking or the use of tobacco products. The enclosed space shall not be open to the public and shall be designed to minimize exposure of nonsmokers to smoke. The program administrator shall annually file a notice of new research with the department of health on a form prescribed by the department. (I) A retail vapor store, insofar as the provisions of this chapter apply to smoking via vapor products and electronic smoking devices. The provisions of this chapter apply to retail vapor stores with regard to all other forms of smoking. The retail vapor store shall annually file with the department of health by the thirty-first day of January an affidavit stating the percentage of its gross income during the prior calendar year that was derived from the sale of vapor products, electronic smoking devices, or other electronic smoking product accessories. (J) A cigar bar licensed under sections 3794.21 to 3794.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3794.21. As used in sections 3794.21 to 3794.24 of the Revised Code: (A) "Child care center" has the same meaning as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Cigar bar" means an establishment that meets all of the following: (1) It sells cigars, and all such cigars are premium cigars. (2) It has a walk-in humidor. (3) It does not sell any other smokeable consumer product. (4) It prohibits the smoking of any consumer product other than premium cigars sold on the premises. (5) It prohibits entry to an individual under twenty-one years of age. (C) "Premium cigar" has the same meaning as in division (Q) of section 5743.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "School" means all of the following: (1) A city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district; (2) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (3) A science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (4) A chartered nonpublic school; (5) An educational service center, on behalf of a school or district. Sec. 3794.22. (A)(1) No person shall operate a cigar bar in this state without a license issued by the director of commerce in conjunction with the director of health in accordance with rules adopted under division (D) of this section. The directors shall issue a license under this section if the applicant submits to the directors an application in compliance with those rules and pays to the directors a license application fee of five hundred dollars. (2) To be eligible to receive a license to operate a cigar bar, an applicant shall hold a current, valid D class liquor permit issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code. (B) A license issued under this section is valid for one year after issuance and shall be renewed in the same manner as an initial license, including payment of a five-hundred-dollar license renewal application fee. (C) Fees collected under this section shall be credited to the cigar bar fund created in section 3794.24 of the Revised Code. (D) The director of commerce, in conjunction with the director of health, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following regarding a license issued under division (A) of this section: (1) Information that must be included with an application for a license; (2) Procedures for the approval of a license; (3) Grounds and procedures for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license; (4) Any other requirements and procedures determined necessary by the directors to implement sections 3794.21 to 3794.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3794.23. (A) The owner of a licensed cigar bar shall post written notice that informs patrons that they will be exposed to cigar smoke in the establishment. The notice shall be displayed in a conspicuous place at each entrance to the cigar bar. The notice shall read "WARNING: Smoking is Allowed in This Establishment." (B) The owner of a cigar bar shall not fail to designate an indoor smoking area. The smoking area shall be separately enclosed and ventilated so that cigar smoke does not enter, through ventilation and air purification systems, any areas where smoking is otherwise prohibited. (C) A cigar bar shall not be located within five hundred feet of a school, church, or child care center, unless approved by local authorities. (D) A municipal corporation may establish requirements that apply to cigar bars within its jurisdiction in addition to those established in sections 3794.21 to 3794.23 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under those sections. Notwithstanding sections 3794.21 to 3794.23 of the Revised Code, a municipal corporation may prohibit the operation of cigar bars through local ordinance. Sec. 3794.24. The cigar bar fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all fees collected under section 3794.22 of the Revised Code. The director of commerce in conjunction with the director of health shall use money in the fund to administer and enforce sections 3794.21 to 3794.23 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under those sections. Sec. 5739.02. For the purpose of providing revenue with which to meet the needs of the state, for the use of the general revenue fund of the state, for the purpose of securing a thorough and efficient system of common schools throughout the state, for the purpose of affording revenues, in addition to those from general property taxes, permitted under constitutional limitations, and from other sources, for the support of local governmental functions, and for the purpose of reimbursing the state for the expense of administering this chapter, an excise tax is hereby levied on each retail sale made in this state. (A)(1) The tax shall be collected as provided in section 5739.025 of the Revised Code. The rate of the tax shall be five and three-fourths per cent. The tax applies and is collectible when the sale is made, regardless of the time when the price is paid or delivered. (2) In the case of the lease or rental, with a fixed term of more than thirty days or an indefinite term with a minimum period of more than thirty days, of any motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of not more than one ton, watercraft, outboard motor, or aircraft, or of any tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of more than one ton, to be used by the lessee or renter primarily for business purposes, the tax shall be collected by the vendor at the time the lease or rental is consummated and shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid by the lessee or renter under the lease agreement. If the total amount of the consideration for the lease or rental includes amounts that are not calculated at the time the lease or rental is executed, the tax shall be calculated and collected by the vendor at the time such amounts are billed to the lessee or renter. In the case of an open-end lease or rental, the tax shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid during the initial fixed term of the lease or rental, and for each subsequent renewal period as it comes due. As used in this division, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, and "watercraft" includes an outdrive unit attached to the watercraft. A lease with a renewal clause and a termination penalty or similar provision that applies if the renewal clause is not exercised is presumed to be a sham transaction. In such a case, the tax shall be calculated and paid on the basis of the entire length of the lease period, including any renewal periods, until the termination penalty or similar provision no longer applies. The taxpayer shall bear the burden, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the transaction or series of transactions is not a sham transaction. (3) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, in the case of a sale, the price of which consists in whole or in part of the lease or rental of tangible personal property, the tax shall be measured by the installments of that lease or rental. (4) In the case of a sale of a physical fitness facility service or recreation and sports club service, the price of which consists in whole or in part of a membership for the receipt of the benefit of the service, the tax applicable to the sale shall be measured by the installments thereof. (B) The tax does not apply to the following: (1) Sales to the state or any of its political subdivisions, or to any other state or its political subdivisions if the laws of that state exempt from taxation sales made to this state and its political subdivisions including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions take title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the state or any of its political subdivisions, including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions, including the general public thereof, receive the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (2) Sales of food for human consumption off the premises where sold; (3) Sales of food sold to students only in a cafeteria, dormitory, fraternity, or sorority maintained in a private, public, or parochial school, college, or university; (4) Sales of newspapers and sales or transfers of magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (5) The furnishing, preparing, or serving of meals without charge by an employer to an employee provided the employer records the meals as part compensation for services performed or work done; (6)(a) Sales of motor fuel upon receipt, use, distribution, or sale of which in this state a tax is imposed by the law of this state, but this exemption shall not apply to the sale of motor fuel on which a refund of the tax is allowable under division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code; and the tax commissioner may deduct the amount of tax levied by this section applicable to the price of motor fuel when granting a refund of motor fuel tax pursuant to division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code and shall cause the amount deducted to be paid into the general revenue fund of this state; (b) Sales of motor fuel other than that described in division (B)(6)(a) of this section and used for powering a refrigeration unit on a vehicle other than one used primarily to provide comfort to the operator or occupants of the vehicle. (7) Sales of natural gas by a natural gas company or municipal gas utility, of water by a water-works company, or of steam by a heating company, if in each case the thing sold is delivered to consumers through pipes or conduits, and all sales of communications services by a telegraph company, all terms as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code, and sales of electricity delivered through wires; (8) Casual sales by a person, or auctioneer employed directly by the person to conduct such sales, except as to such sales of motor vehicles, watercraft or outboard motors required to be titled under section 1548.06 of the Revised Code, watercraft documented with the United States coast guard, snowmobiles, and all-purpose vehicles as defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code; (9)(a) Sales of services or tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles, mobile homes, and manufactured homes, by churches, organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes as defined in division (B)(12) of this section, provided that the number of days on which such tangible personal property or services, other than items never subject to the tax, are sold does not exceed six in any calendar year, except as otherwise provided in division (B)(9)(b) of this section. If the number of days on which such sales are made exceeds six in any calendar year, the church or organization shall be considered to be engaged in business and all subsequent sales by it shall be subject to the tax. In counting the number of days, all sales by groups within a church or within an organization shall be considered to be sales of that church or organization. (b) The limitation on the number of days on which tax-exempt sales may be made by a church or organization under division (B)(9)(a) of this section does not apply to sales made by student clubs and other groups of students of a primary or secondary school, or a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization that raises money to support or fund curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school. (c) Divisions (B)(9)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to sales by a noncommercial educational radio or television broadcasting station. (10) Sales not within the taxing power of this state under the Constitution or laws of the United States or the Constitution of this state including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States takes title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the United States including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States, including the general public thereof, receives the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(10)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (11) Except for transactions that are sales under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, the transportation of persons or property, unless the transportation is by a private investigation and security service; (12) Sales of tangible personal property or services to churches, to organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and to any other nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes in this state, no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and no substantial part of the activities of which consists of carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence legislation; sales to offices administering one or more homes for the aged or one or more hospital facilities exempt under section 140.08 of the Revised Code; and sales to organizations described in division (D) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. "Charitable purposes" means the relief of poverty; the improvement of health through the alleviation of illness, disease, or injury; the operation of an organization exclusively for the provision of professional, laundry, printing, and purchasing services to hospitals or charitable institutions; the operation of a home for the aged, as defined in section 5701.13 of the Revised Code; the operation of a radio or television broadcasting station that is licensed by the federal communications commission as a noncommercial educational radio or television station; the operation of a nonprofit animal adoption service or a county humane society; the promotion of education by an institution of learning that maintains a faculty of qualified instructors, teaches regular continuous courses of study, and confers a recognized diploma upon completion of a specific curriculum; the operation of a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization primarily engaged in the promotion and support of the curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school; the operation of a community or area center in which presentations in music, dramatics, the arts, and related fields are made in order to foster public interest and education therein; the production of performances in music, dramatics, and the arts; or the promotion of education by an organization engaged in carrying on research in, or the dissemination of, scientific and technological knowledge and information primarily for the public. Nothing in this division shall be deemed to exempt sales to any organization for use in the operation or carrying on of a trade or business, or sales to a home for the aged for use in the operation of independent living facilities as defined in division (A) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. (13) Building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with this state or a political subdivision of this state, or with the United States government or any of its agencies; building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that are accepted for ownership by this state or any of its political subdivisions, or by the United States government or any of its agencies at the time of completion of the structures or improvements; building and construction materials sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a horticulture structure or livestock structure for a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a house of public worship or religious education, or a building used exclusively for charitable purposes under a construction contract with an organization whose purpose is as described in division (B)(12) of this section; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a building under a construction contract with an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 when the building is to be used exclusively for the organization's exempt purposes; tangible personal property sold for incorporation into the construction of a sports facility under section 307.696 of the Revised Code; building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into real property outside this state if such materials and services, when sold to a construction contractor in the state in which the real property is located for incorporation into real property in that state, would be exempt from a tax on sales levied by that state; building and construction materials for incorporation into a transportation facility pursuant to a public-private agreement entered into under sections 5501.70 to 5501.83 of the Revised Code; until one calendar year after the construction of a convention center that qualifies for property tax exemption under section 5709.084 of the Revised Code is completed, building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into the real property comprising that convention center; and building and construction materials sold for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that is used primarily as, or primarily in support of, a manufacturing facility or research and development facility and that is to be owned by a megaproject operator upon completion and located at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated. This division does not apply to building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with a port authority if the contract is subject to section 4582.72 of the Revised Code but approval from the appropriate board of county commissioners, as required by that section, has not been obtained. (14) Sales of ships or vessels or rail rolling stock used or to be used principally in interstate or foreign commerce, and repairs, alterations, fuel, and lubricants for such ships or vessels or rail rolling stock; (15) Sales to persons primarily engaged in any of the activities mentioned in division (B)(42)(a), (g), or (h) of this section, to persons engaged in making retail sales, or to persons who purchase for sale from a manufacturer tangible personal property that was produced by the manufacturer in accordance with specific designs provided by the purchaser, of packages, including material, labels, and parts for packages, and of machinery, equipment, and material for use primarily in packaging tangible personal property produced for sale, including any machinery, equipment, and supplies used to make labels or packages, to prepare packages or products for labeling, or to label packages or products, by or on the order of the person doing the packaging, or sold at retail. "Packages" includes bags, baskets, cartons, crates, boxes, cans, bottles, bindings, wrappings, and other similar devices and containers, but does not include motor vehicles or bulk tanks, trailers, or similar devices attached to motor vehicles. "Packaging" means placing in a package. Division (B)(15) of this section does not apply to persons engaged in highway transportation for hire. (16) Sales of food to persons using supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits to purchase the food. As used in this division, "food" has the same meaning as in 7 U.S.C. 2012 and federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008. (17) Sales to persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, of tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture of other tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production of tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture; or material and parts for incorporation into any such tangible personal property for use or consumption in production; and of tangible personal property for such use or consumption in the conditioning or holding of products produced by and for such use, consumption, or sale by persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, except where such property is incorporated into real property; (18) Sales of drugs for a human being that may be dispensed only pursuant to a prescription; insulin as recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia; urine and blood testing materials when used by diabetics or persons with hypoglycemia to test for glucose or acetone; hypodermic syringes and needles when used by diabetics for insulin injections; epoetin alfa when purchased for use in the treatment of persons with medical disease; hospital beds when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; and medical oxygen and medical oxygen-dispensing equipment when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; (19) Sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical equipment for home use, or mobility enhancing equipment, when made pursuant to a prescription and when such devices or equipment are for use by a human being. (20) Sales of emergency and fire protection vehicles and equipment to nonprofit organizations for use solely in providing fire protection and emergency services, including trauma care and emergency medical services, for political subdivisions of the state; (21) Sales of tangible personal property manufactured in this state, if sold by the manufacturer in this state to a retailer for use in the retail business of the retailer outside of this state and if possession is taken from the manufacturer by the purchaser within this state for the sole purpose of immediately removing the same from this state in a vehicle owned by the purchaser; (22) Sales of services provided by the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities, or by governmental entities of the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities; (23) Sales of motor vehicles to nonresidents of this state under the circumstances described in division (B) of section 5739.029 of the Revised Code; (24) Sales to persons engaged in the preparation of eggs for sale of tangible personal property used or consumed directly in such preparation, including such tangible personal property used for cleaning, sanitizing, preserving, grading, sorting, and classifying by size; packages, including material and parts for packages, and machinery, equipment, and material for use in packaging eggs for sale; and handling and transportation equipment and parts therefor, except motor vehicles licensed to operate on public highways, used in intraplant or interplant transfers or shipment of eggs in the process of preparation for sale, when the plant or plants within or between which such transfers or shipments occur are operated by the same person. "Packages" includes containers, cases, baskets, flats, fillers, filler flats, cartons, closure materials, labels, and labeling materials, and "packaging" means placing therein. (25)(a) Sales of water to a consumer for residential use; (b) Sales of water by a nonprofit corporation engaged exclusively in the treatment, distribution, and sale of water to consumers, if such water is delivered to consumers through pipes or tubing. (26) Fees charged for inspection or reinspection of motor vehicles under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code; (27) Sales to persons licensed to conduct a food service operation pursuant to section 3717.43 of the Revised Code, of tangible personal property primarily used directly for the following: (a) To prepare food for human consumption for sale; (b) To preserve food that has been or will be prepared for human consumption for sale by the food service operator, not including tangible personal property used to display food for selection by the consumer; (c) To clean tangible personal property used to prepare or serve food for human consumption for sale. (28) Sales of animals by nonprofit animal adoption services or county humane societies; (29) Sales of services to a corporation described in division (A) of section 5709.72 of the Revised Code, and sales of tangible personal property that qualifies for exemption from taxation under section 5709.72 of the Revised Code; (30) Sales and installation of agricultural land tile, as defined in division (B)(5)(a) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (31) Sales and erection or installation of portable grain bins, as defined in division (B)(5)(b) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (32) The sale, lease, repair, and maintenance of, parts for, or items attached to or incorporated in, motor vehicles that are primarily used for transporting tangible personal property belonging to others by a person engaged in highway transportation for hire, except for packages and packaging used for the transportation of tangible personal property; (33) Sales to the state headquarters of any veterans' organization in this state that is either incorporated and issued a charter by the congress of the United States or is recognized by the United States veterans administration, for use by the headquarters; (34) Sales to a telecommunications service vendor, mobile telecommunications service vendor, or satellite broadcasting service vendor of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in transmitting, receiving, switching, or recording any interactive, one- or two-way electromagnetic communications, including voice, image, data, and information, through the use of any medium, including, but not limited to, poles, wires, cables, switching equipment, computers, and record storage devices and media, and component parts for the tangible personal property. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions under division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which the vendor may otherwise be entitled, based upon the use of the thing purchased in providing the telecommunications, mobile telecommunications, or satellite broadcasting service. (35) Sales of strollers meant for transporting children from infancy to about thirty-six months of age that meet the United States consumer product safety commission safety standard for carriages and strollers under 16 C.F.R. 1227.2. (36) Sales to a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock of materials to be incorporated into a horticulture structure or livestock structure; (37) Sales of personal computers, computer monitors, computer keyboards, modems, and other peripheral computer equipment to an individual who is licensed or certified to teach in an elementary or a secondary school in this state for use by that individual in preparation for teaching elementary or secondary school students; (38) Sales of tangible personal property that is not required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this state to a citizen of a foreign nation that is not a citizen of the United States, provided the property is delivered to a person in this state that is not a related member of the purchaser, is physically present in this state for the sole purpose of temporary storage and package consolidation, and is subsequently delivered to the purchaser at a delivery address in a foreign nation. As used in division (B)(38) of this section, "related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code, and "temporary storage" means the storage of tangible personal property for a period of not more than sixty days. (39) Sales of used manufactured homes and used mobile homes, as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, made on or after January 1, 2000; (40) Sales of tangible personal property and services to a provider of electricity used or consumed directly and primarily in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity for use by others, including property that is or is to be incorporated into and will become a part of the consumer's production, transmission, or distribution system and that retains its classification as tangible personal property after incorporation; fuel or power used in the production, transmission, or distribution of electricity; energy conversion equipment as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; and tangible personal property and services used in the repair and maintenance of the production, transmission, or distribution system, including only those motor vehicles as are specially designed and equipped for such use. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions in division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which a provider of electricity may otherwise be entitled based on the use of the tangible personal property or service purchased in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity. (41) Sales to a person providing services under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in providing taxable services under that section. (42) Sales where the purpose of the purchaser is to do any of the following: (a) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into tangible personal property to be produced for sale by manufacturing, assembling, processing, or refining; or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in producing tangible personal property for sale by mining, including, without limitation, the extraction from the earth of all substances that are classed geologically as minerals, or directly in the rendition of a public utility service, except that the sales tax levied by this section shall be collected upon all meals, drinks, and food for human consumption sold when transporting persons. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (b) To hold the thing transferred as security for the performance of an obligation of the vendor; (c) To resell, hold, use, or consume the thing transferred as evidence of a contract of insurance; (d) To use or consume the thing directly in commercial fishing; (e) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into, or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in the production of, magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (f) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production and preparation in suitable condition for market and sale of printed, imprinted, overprinted, lithographic, multilithic, blueprinted, photostatic, or other productions or reproductions of written or graphic matter; (g) To use the thing transferred, as described in section 5739.011 of the Revised Code, primarily in a manufacturing operation to produce tangible personal property for sale; (h) To use the benefit of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement, as described in division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, to repair or maintain tangible personal property, if all of the property that is the subject of the warranty, contract, or agreement would not be subject to the tax imposed by this section; (i) To use the thing transferred as qualified research and development equipment; (j) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in storing, transporting, mailing, or otherwise handling purchased sales inventory in a warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility when the inventory is primarily distributed outside this state to retail stores of the person who owns or controls the warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility, to retail stores of an affiliated group of which that person is a member, or by means of direct marketing. This division does not apply to motor vehicles registered for operation on the public highways. As used in this division, "affiliated group" has the same meaning as in division (B)(3)(e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code and "direct marketing" means the method of selling where consumers order tangible personal property by United States mail, delivery service, or telecommunication and the vendor delivers or ships the tangible personal property sold to the consumer from a warehouse, catalogue distribution center, or similar fulfillment facility by means of the United States mail, delivery service, or common carrier. (k) To use or consume the thing transferred to fulfill a contractual obligation incurred by a warrantor pursuant to a warranty provided as a part of the price of the tangible personal property sold or by a vendor of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement the provision of which is defined as a sale under division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (l) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production of a newspaper for distribution to the public; (m) To use tangible personal property to perform a service listed in division (B)(3) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, if the property is or is to be permanently transferred to the consumer of the service as an integral part of the performance of the service; (n) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in producing tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. Persons engaged in rendering farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture services for others are deemed engaged primarily in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (q)(o) To use or consume the thing transferred directly in production of crude oil and natural gas for sale. Persons engaged in rendering production services for others are deemed engaged in production. As used in division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, "production" means operations and tangible personal property directly used to expose and evaluate an underground reservoir that may contain hydrocarbon resources, prepare the wellbore for production, and lift and control all substances yielded by the reservoir to the surface of the earth. (i) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, the "thing transferred" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (I) Services provided in the construction of permanent access roads, services provided in the construction of the well site, and services provided in the construction of temporary impoundments; (II) Equipment and rigging used for the specific purpose of creating with integrity a wellbore pathway to underground reservoirs; (III) Drilling and workover services used to work within a subsurface wellbore, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (IV) Casing, tubulars, and float and centralizing equipment; (V) Trailers to which production equipment is attached; (VI) Well completion services, including cementing of casing, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VII) Wireline evaluation, mud logging, and perforation services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VIII) Reservoir stimulation, hydraulic fracturing, and acidizing services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services, including all material pumped downhole; (IX) Pressure pumping equipment; (X) Artificial lift systems equipment; (XI) Wellhead equipment and well site equipment used to separate, stabilize, and control hydrocarbon phases and produced water; (XII) Tangible personal property directly used to control production equipment. (ii) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, the "thing transferred" does not include any of the following: (I) Tangible personal property used primarily in the exploration and production of any mineral resource regulated under Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code other than oil or gas; (II) Tangible personal property used primarily in storing, holding, or delivering solutions or chemicals used in well stimulation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code; (III) Tangible personal property used primarily in preparing, installing, or reclaiming foundations for drilling or pumping equipment or well stimulation material tanks; (IV) Tangible personal property used primarily in transporting, delivering, or removing equipment to or from the well site or storing such equipment before its use at the well site; (V) Tangible personal property used primarily in gathering operations occurring off the well site, including gathering pipelines transporting hydrocarbon gas or liquids away from a crude oil or natural gas production facility; (VI) Tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property; (VII) Well site fencing, lighting, or security systems; (VIII) Communication devices or services; (IX) Office supplies; (X) Trailers used as offices or lodging; (XI) Motor vehicles of any kind; (XII) Tangible personal property used primarily for the storage of drilling byproducts and fuel not used for production; (XIII) Tangible personal property used primarily as a safety device; (XIV) Data collection or monitoring devices; (XV) Access ladders, stairs, or platforms attached to storage tanks. The enumeration of tangible personal property in division (B)(42)(q)(ii)(B)(42)(o)(ii) of this section is not intended to be exhaustive, and any tangible personal property not so enumerated shall not necessarily be construed to be a "thing transferred" for the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section. The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules under sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code that the commissioner deems necessary to administer division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section. As used in division (B)(42) of this section, "thing" includes all transactions included in divisions (B)(3)(a), (b), and (e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. (43) Sales conducted through a coin operated device that activates vacuum equipment or equipment that dispenses water, whether or not in combination with soap or other cleaning agents or wax, to the consumer for the consumer's use on the premises in washing, cleaning, or waxing a motor vehicle, provided no other personal property or personal service is provided as part of the transaction. (44) Sales of replacement and modification parts for engines, airframes, instruments, and interiors in, and paint for, aircraft used primarily in a fractional aircraft ownership program, and sales of services for the repair, modification, and maintenance of such aircraft, and machinery, equipment, and supplies primarily used to provide those services. (45) The fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code, if it is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given by the vendor to the consumer for a retail sale made in this state. (46) Sales by a telecommunications service vendor of 900 service to a subscriber. This division does not apply to information services. (47) Sales of value-added non-voice data service. This division does not apply to any similar service that is not otherwise a telecommunications service. (48) Sales of feminine hygiene products. (49) Sales of materials, parts, equipment, or engines used in the repair or maintenance of aircraft or avionics systems of such aircraft, and sales of repair, remodeling, replacement, or maintenance services in this state performed on aircraft or on an aircraft's avionics, engine, or component materials or parts. As used in division (B)(49) of this section, "aircraft" means aircraft of more than six thousand pounds maximum certified takeoff weight or used exclusively in general aviation. (50) Sales of full flight simulators that are used for pilot or flight-crew training, sales of repair or replacement parts or components, and sales of repair or maintenance services for such full flight simulators. "Full flight simulator" means a replica of a specific type, or make, model, and series of aircraft cockpit. It includes the assemblage of equipment and computer programs necessary to represent aircraft operations in ground and flight conditions, a visual system providing an out-of-the-cockpit view, and a system that provides cues at least equivalent to those of a three-degree-of-freedom motion system, and has the full range of capabilities of the systems installed in the device as described in appendices A and B of part 60 of chapter 1 of title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (51) Any transfer or lease of tangible personal property between the state and JobsOhio in accordance with section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. (52)(a) Sales to a qualifying corporation. (b) As used in division (B)(52) of this section: (i) "Qualifying corporation" means a nonprofit corporation organized in this state that leases from an eligible county land, buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements to the land that are part of or used in a public recreational facility used by a major league professional athletic team or a class A to class AAA minor league affiliate of a major league professional athletic team for a significant portion of the team's home schedule, provided the following apply: (I) The facility is leased from the eligible county pursuant to a lease that requires substantially all of the revenue from the operation of the business or activity conducted by the nonprofit corporation at the facility in excess of operating costs, capital expenditures, and reserves to be paid to the eligible county at least once per calendar year. (II) Upon dissolution and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation, all of its net assets are distributable to the board of commissioners of the eligible county from which the corporation leases the facility. (ii) "Eligible county" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (53) Sales to or by a cable service provider, video service provider, or radio or television broadcast station regulated by the federal government of cable service or programming, video service or programming, audio service or programming, or electronically transferred digital audiovisual or audio work. As used in division (B)(53) of this section, "cable service" and "cable service provider" have the same meanings as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code, and "video service," "video service provider," and "video programming" have the same meanings as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (54) Sales of a digital audio work electronically transferred for delivery through use of a machine, such as a juke box, that does all of the following: (a) Accepts direct payments to operate; (b) Automatically plays a selected digital audio work for a single play upon receipt of a payment described in division (B)(54)(a) of this section; (c) Operates exclusively for the purpose of playing digital audio works in a commercial establishment. (55)(a) Sales of the following occurring on the first Friday of August and the following Saturday and Sunday of any year, except in 2024 or any subsequent year in which a sales tax holiday is held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code: (i) An item of clothing, the price of which is seventy-five dollars or less; (ii) An item of school supplies, the price of which is twenty dollars or less; (iii) An item of school instructional material, the price of which is twenty dollars or less. (b) As used in division (B)(55) of this section: (i) "Clothing" means all human wearing apparel suitable for general use. "Clothing" includes, but is not limited to, aprons, household and shop; athletic supporters; baby receiving blankets; bathing suits and caps; beach capes and coats; belts and suspenders; boots; coats and jackets; costumes; diapers, children and adult, including disposable diapers; earmuffs; footlets; formal wear; garters and garter belts; girdles; gloves and mittens for general use; hats and caps; hosiery; insoles for shoes; lab coats; neckties; overshoes; pantyhose; rainwear; rubber pants; sandals; scarves; shoes and shoe laces; slippers; sneakers; socks and stockings; steel-toed shoes; underwear; uniforms, athletic and nonathletic; and wedding apparel. "Clothing" does not include items purchased for use in a trade or business; clothing accessories or equipment; protective equipment; sports or recreational equipment; belt buckles sold separately; costume masks sold separately; patches and emblems sold separately; sewing equipment and supplies including, but not limited to, knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, sewing machines, sewing needles, tape measures, and thimbles; and sewing materials that become part of "clothing" including, but not limited to, buttons, fabric, lace, thread, yarn, and zippers. (ii) "School supplies" means items commonly used by a student in a course of study. "School supplies" includes only the following items: binders; book bags; calculators; cellophane tape; blackboard chalk; compasses; composition books; crayons; erasers; folders, expandable, pocket, plastic, and manila; glue, paste, and paste sticks; highlighters; index cards; index card boxes; legal pads; lunch boxes; markers; notebooks; paper, loose-leaf ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila paper, colored paper, poster board, and construction paper; pencil boxes and other school supply boxes; pencil sharpeners; pencils; pens; protractors; rulers; scissors; and writing tablets. "School supplies" does not include any item purchased for use in a trade or business. (iii) "School instructional material" means written material commonly used by a student in a course of study as a reference and to learn the subject being taught. "School instructional material" includes only the following items: reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks, and workbooks. "School instructional material" does not include any material purchased for use in a trade or business. (56)(a) Sales of adult diapers or incontinence underpads sold pursuant to a prescription, for the benefit of a medicaid recipient with a diagnosis of incontinence, and by a medicaid provider that maintains a valid provider agreement under section 5164.30 of the Revised Code with the department of medicaid, provided that the medicaid program covers diapers or incontinence underpads as an incontinence garment. (b) As used in division (B)(56)(a) of this section, "incontinence underpad" means an absorbent product, not worn on the body, designed to protect furniture or other tangible personal property from soiling or damage due to human incontinence. (57) Sales of investment metal bullion and investment coins. "Investment metal bullion" means any bullion described in section 408(m)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of whether that bullion is in the physical possession of a trustee. "Investment coin" means any coin composed primarily of gold, silver, platinum, or palladium. (58) Sales of tangible personal property used primarily for any of the following purposes by a megaproject operator at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated: (a) To store, transmit, convey, distribute, recycle, circulate, or clean water, steam, or other gases used in or produced as a result of manufacturing activity, including items that support or aid in the operation of such property; (b) To clean or prepare inventory, at any stage of storage or production, or equipment used in a manufacturing activity, including chemicals, solvents, catalysts, soaps, and other items that support or aid in the operation of property; (c) To regulate, treat, filter, condition, improve, clean, maintain, or monitor environmental conditions within areas where manufacturing activities take place; (d) To handle, transport, or convey inventory during production or manufacturing. (59) Documentary services charges imposed pursuant to section 4517.261 or 4781.24 of the Revised Code. (60) Sales of children's diapers. (61) Sales of therapeutic or preventative creams and wipes marketed primarily for use on the skin of children. (62) Sales of a child restraint device or booster seat that meets the national highway traffic safety administration standard for child restraint systems under 49 C.F.R. 571.213. (63) Sales of cribs intended to provide sleeping accommodations for children that comply with the United States consumer product safety commission's safety standard for full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1219 or the commission's safety standard for non-full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1220. (64) Sales of eligible tangible personal property occurring during the period of a sales tax holiday held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code. (65) Sales of cigars by a vendor for consumption on the premises of either of the following owned by the vendor: (a) A cigar bar that holds a current, valid license issued under section 3794.22 of the Revised Code; (b) A retail tobacco store, as defined in section 3794.03 of the Revised Code, if the only products that the store allows consumers to smoke on its premises are cigars. (C) For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter, and to prevent the evasion of the tax, it is presumed that all sales made in this state are subject to the tax until the contrary is established. (D) The tax collected by the vendor from the consumer under this chapter is not part of the price, but is a tax collection for the benefit of the state, and of counties levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.021 or 5739.026 of the Revised Code and of transit authorities levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.023 of the Revised Code. Except for the discount authorized under section 5739.12 of the Revised Code and the effects of any rounding pursuant to section 5703.055 of the Revised Code, no person other than the state or such a county or transit authority shall derive any benefit from the collection or payment of the tax levied by this section or section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.03. (A) Except as provided in section 5739.05 or section 5739.051 of the Revised Code, the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code shall be paid by the consumer to the vendor, and each vendor shall collect from the consumer, as a trustee for the state of Ohio, the full and exact amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale, in the manner and at the times provided as follows: (1) If the price is, at or prior to the provision of the service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold to the consumer, paid in currency passed from hand to hand by the consumer or the consumer's agent to the vendor or the vendor's agent, the vendor or the vendor's agent shall collect the tax with and at the same time as the price; (2) If the price is otherwise paid or to be paid, the vendor or the vendor's agent shall, at or prior to the provision of the service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold to the consumer, charge the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code to the account of the consumer, which amount shall be collected by the vendor from the consumer in addition to the price. Such sale shall be reported on and the amount of the tax applicable thereto shall be remitted with the return for the period in which the sale is made, and the amount of the tax shall become a legal charge in favor of the vendor and against the consumer. (B)(1)(a) If any sale is claimed to be exempt under division (E) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code or under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, with the exception of divisions (B)(1) to (11), (28), (48), (55), (59), or (62), or (65) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the consumer must provide to the vendor, and the vendor must obtain from the consumer, a certificate specifying the reason that the sale is not legally subject to the tax. The certificate shall be in such form, and shall be provided either in a hard copy form or electronic form, as the tax commissioner prescribes. (b) A vendor that obtains a fully completed exemption certificate from a consumer is relieved of liability for collecting and remitting tax on any sale covered by that certificate. If it is determined the exemption was improperly claimed, the consumer shall be liable for any tax due on that sale under section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 or Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code. Relief under this division from liability does not apply to any of the following: (i) A vendor that fraudulently fails to collect tax; (ii) A vendor that solicits consumers to participate in the unlawful claim of an exemption; (iii) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from a consumer that claims an exemption based on who purchases or who sells property or a service, when the subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the exemption certificate is actually received by the consumer at a location operated by the vendor in this state, and this state has posted to its web site an exemption certificate form that clearly and affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in this state; (iv) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from a consumer who claims a multiple points of use exemption under division (D) of section 5739.033 of the Revised Code, if the item purchased is tangible personal property, other than prewritten computer software. (2) The vendor shall maintain records, including exemption certificates, of all sales on which a consumer has claimed an exemption, and provide them to the tax commissioner on request. (3) The tax commissioner may establish an identification system whereby the commissioner issues an identification number to a consumer that is exempt from payment of the tax. The consumer must present the number to the vendor, if any sale is claimed to be exempt as provided in this section. (4) If no certificate is provided or obtained within ninety days after the date on which such sale is consummated, it shall be presumed that the tax applies. Failure to have so provided or obtained a certificate shall not preclude a vendor, within one hundred twenty days after the tax commissioner gives written notice of intent to levy an assessment, from either establishing that the sale is not subject to the tax, or obtaining, in good faith, a fully completed exemption certificate. (5) Certificates need not be obtained nor provided where the identity of the consumer is such that the transaction is never subject to the tax imposed or where the item of tangible personal property sold or the service provided is never subject to the tax imposed, regardless of use, or when the sale is in interstate commerce. (6) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the contractor shall obtain certification of the claimed exemption from the contractee. This certification shall be in addition to an exemption certificate provided by the contractor to the vendor. A contractee that provides a certification under this division shall be deemed to be the consumer of all items purchased by the contractor under the claim of exemption, if it is subsequently determined that the exemption is not properly claimed. The certification shall be in such form as the tax commissioner prescribes. (7) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the person that leases a sports facility, as defined in section 307.696 of the Revised Code, wholly owned by a county may provide and sign, on behalf of the county, an exemption certificate required under this section for that exemption. (C) As used in this division, "contractee" means a person who seeks to enter or enters into a contract or agreement with a contractor or vendor for the construction of real property or for the sale and installation onto real property of tangible personal property. Any contractor or vendor may request from any contractee a certification of what portion of the property to be transferred under such contract or agreement is to be incorporated into the realty and what portion will retain its status as tangible personal property after installation is completed. The contractor or vendor shall request the certification by certified mail delivered to the contractee, return receipt requested. Upon receipt of such request and prior to entering into the contract or agreement, the contractee shall provide to the contractor or vendor a certification sufficiently detailed to enable the contractor or vendor to ascertain the resulting classification of all materials purchased or fabricated by the contractor or vendor and transferred to the contractee. This requirement applies to a contractee regardless of whether the contractee holds a direct payment permit under section 5739.031 of the Revised Code or provides to the contractor or vendor an exemption certificate as provided under this section. For the purposes of the taxes levied by this chapter and Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code, the contractor or vendor may in good faith rely on the contractee's certification. Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, if the tax commissioner determines that certain property certified by the contractee as tangible personal property pursuant to this division is, in fact, real property, the contractee shall be considered to be the consumer of all materials so incorporated into that real property and shall be liable for the applicable tax, and the contractor or vendor shall be excused from any liability on those materials. If a contractee fails to provide such certification upon the request of the contractor or vendor, the contractor or vendor shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code without the certification. If the tax commissioner determines that such compliance has been performed in good faith and that certain property treated as tangible personal property by the contractor or vendor is, in fact, real property, the contractee shall be considered to be the consumer of all materials so incorporated into that real property and shall be liable for the applicable tax, and the construction contractor or vendor shall be excused from any liability on those materials. This division does not apply to any contract or agreement where the tax commissioner determines as a fact that a certification under this division was made solely on the decision or advice of the contractor or vendor. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, whenever the total rate of tax imposed under this chapter is increased after the date after a construction contract is entered into, the contractee shall reimburse the construction contractor for any additional tax paid on tangible property consumed or services received pursuant to the contract. (E) A vendor who files a petition for reassessment contesting the assessment of tax on sales for which the vendor obtained no valid exemption certificates and for which the vendor failed to establish that the sales were properly not subject to the tax during the one-hundred-twenty-day period allowed under division (B) of this section, may present to the tax commissioner additional evidence to prove that the sales were properly subject to a claim of exception or exemption. The vendor shall file such evidence within ninety days of the receipt by the vendor of the notice of assessment, except that, upon application and for reasonable cause, the period for submitting such evidence shall be extended thirty days. The commissioner shall consider such additional evidence in reaching the final determination on the assessment and petition for reassessment. (F) Whenever a vendor refunds the price, minus any separately stated delivery charge, of an item of tangible personal property on which the tax imposed under this chapter has been paid, the vendor shall also refund the amount of tax paid, minus the amount of tax attributable to the delivery charge. Section 2. That existing sections 3794.03, 5739.02, and 5739.03 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The amendment by this act of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code applies on and after the first day of the first month beginning after the effective date of this section.